Florida, session 2026, SB894.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âSection 627.4635, Florida Statutes, is created 35 to read: 36 627.4635âRestrictions on employer-owned life insurance 37 policies.â 38 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 39 (a)ââEmployer-owned life insuranceâ means a life insurance 40 policy owned by, or payable to, an employer on the life of a 41 current or former employee. The term also includes company-owned 42 life insurance or corporate-owned life insurance, a life 43 insurance policy owned by, or payable, to a company or 44 corporation, rather than an individual, on the life of a current 45 or former employee. 46 (b)ââKey personâ means an owner, senior executive, 47 director, officer, partner, or manager of a business entity, 48 organization, company, or corporation whose death would cause 49 direct, material financial harm to the business entity, 50 organization, company, or corporation. 51 (c)ââRank-and-file employeeâ means any employee who is not 52 a key person. 53 (2)âEMPLOYER-OWNED LIFE INSURANCE POLICIES COVERING KEY 54 PERSONS.â 55 (a)âAn employer may purchase, maintain, or be a beneficiary 56 of an employer-owned life insurance policy covering a key person 57 only if all the following conditions are met: 58 1.âThe employer has obtained the key personâs informed, 59 written, and revocable consent before purchasing the policy. 60 2.âThe employer has provided written notice of the policy 61 to the key personâs spouse, next of kin, or estate 62 representative within 30 days after issuance of the policy. 63 3.âThe employer does not maintain more than five key person 64 policies at any one time without prior approval of the office. 65 The five key persons must be the five highest ranking persons in 66 the employerâs business, organization, company, or corporation, 67 based on their seniority, salaries, and benefits. 68 4.âThe death benefit of any key personâs policy does not 69 exceed five times that key personâs average annual compensation 70 for the 3 years immediately preceding issuance. 71 5.âUpon the key personâs termination of employment, the 72 employer either cancels the policy or, with the key personâs 73 written consent, transfers ownership to the key person or his or 74 her family. 75 (b)1.âIf an employer-owner life insurance policy is issued 76 before July 1, 2026, and all the conditions in paragraph (a) are 77 met, the employer must, by January 1, 2027, provide to the key 78 person whose life is covered by the employer-owned life 79 insurance policy the standard form described in subsection (7), 80 which informs the key person that the policy does not benefit 81 the key person, but fully benefits the employer, and that the 82 key person has the option to opt out of the policy. 83 2.âIf an employer-owned life insurance policy is issued on 84 or after July 1, 2026, and before October 1, 2026, the employer 85 must, before purchasing the policy, inform the key person whose 86 life is covered by the employer-owned life insurance policy that 87 the policy does not benefit the key person, but fully benefits 88 the employer, and that the key person has the option to reject 89 the policy. 90 3.âIf an employer-owned life insurance policy is issued on 91 or after October 1, 2026, the employer must, before purchasing 92 the policy, provide to the key person the standard form 93 described in subsection (7), which informs the key person that 94 the policy does not benefit the key person, but fully benefits 95 the employer, and that the key person has the option to reject 96 the policy. 97 (3)âCERTAIN EMPLOYER-OWNED LIFE INSURANCE POLICIES 98 PROHIBITED.â 99 (a)âExcept as provided in subsection (7), an employer may 100 not purchase, maintain, or be a beneficiary of an employer-owned 101 life insurance policy if the policy covers a rank-and-file 102 employee or if any of the conditions described in subsection (2) 103 are not met. 104 (b)âAny insurance policy purchased or maintained in 105 violation of paragraph (a) is void as against public policy. 106 (4)âNOTICES; REGISTRY AND REPORTING.â 107 (a)âEach insurer issuing an employer-owned life insurance 108 policy shall file notice with the office. The notice must 109 include the employerâs name, the number of employees insured, 110 and the aggregate face value of the policies. 111 (b)âThe office shall maintain a publicly searchable online 112 registry of the filings under paragraph (a) and shall publish an 113 annual report of such filings. 114 (c)âAn employer that purchases, maintains, or is a 115 beneficiary of an employer-owned life insurance policy shall 116 inform all key persons and shall publicly disclose, such as 117 through publication on the employerâs publicly available 118 Internet website, that the employer has met all the requirements 119 of this section. 120 (5)âTAX TREATMENT.â 121 (a)âPremiums, loan interest, or related expenses for 122 employer-owned life insurance are not deductible under the laws 123 of this state. 124 (b)âAny death benefit received by an employer under an 125 employer-owned life insurance policy is subject to corporate 126 income tax unless paid directly to the employeeâs estate or 127 family. 128 (6)âENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIES.â 129 (a)âAn employer that violates this section is liable for 130 civil penalties up to five times the death benefit collected. 131 (b)âAn employeeâs family has a private right of action to 132 recover the full value of any benefit collected in violation of 133 this section. 134 (c)âAn insurer that knowingly issues or administers a 135 policy in violation of this section is subject to an 136 administrative fine of up to $1 million per violation and may 137 have its authority to transact insurance in this state suspended 138 or revoked. 139 (7)âSTANDARD FORM.âBy October 1, 2026, the office shall 140 adopt a standard form, written in plain and simple language, 141 informing a key person that an employer-owned life insurance 142 policy does not benefit the key person, but fully benefits the 143 employer, and that the key person has the option to reject or 144 opt out of the policy. 145 (8)âAPPLICABILITY.â 146 (a)âThis section applies to all new policies issued on or 147 after July 1, 2026. 148 (b)âThe restrictions on and the prohibitions against 149 employer-owned life insurance policies under subsections (2) and 150 (3), respectively, apply retroactively to existing policies 151 unless the insured employee or the insured employeeâs family 152 affirmatively opts to maintain the policy and is named as the 153 sole beneficiary, in which case all death benefits shall be paid 154 to the employeeâs estate or designated family beneficiary. 155 (c)âIf any provision of this section is in conflict with 156 any other law, the provisions of this section shall govern. 157 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.